Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.130

Revocation, suspension, or denial.

(1) Any license, permit, or certification provided for in this chapter may be revoked or suspended, and any license, permit, or certification application may be denied by the director for cause. If the director suspends a license under this chapter with respect to activity of a continuing nature under chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may elect to suspend the license for a subsequent license year during a period that coincides with the period commencing 30 days before and ending 30 days after the date of the incident or incidents giving rise to the violation.

(2) The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(3) The director may elect to suspend or revoke any license or certification that is based in whole or in part on a license or certification from another state or jurisdiction upon notification that the applicator's original certification was terminated because the certified applicator has been convicted under section 14(b) of FIFRA or has been subject to a final order imposing a civil penalty under section 14(a) of FIFRA.

[ 2023 c 186 s 2; 1997 c 58 s 877; 1994 c 283 s 15; 1989 c 380 s 46; 1986 c 203 s 10; 1961 c 249 s 13.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.